Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202573-1003
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Secure Drone Purchasing Act:

(1) Division means the Division of Aeronautics of the Department of Transportation; and

(2) The terms unmanned aerial system and drone are synonymous as used in the act and mean a powered, aerial vehicle that:

(a) Does not carry a human operator and is operated without the possibility of direct human intervention from within or on the aircraft;

(b) Uses aerodynamic forces to provide vehicle lift;

(c) Can fly autonomously or be piloted remotely; and

(d) Can be expendable or recoverable.

Laws 2025, LB660, § 22.